Utah, session 2026, HB532.
Section 1. Section 53F-5-224 is enacted to read:53F-5-224. School-based Behavioral Health Pilot Program.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Group-based mental health services" means structured mental health or behavioral health services that qualified personnel deliver to more than one student at the same time, if:(i)each student who participates has documented parental consent;(ii)qualified personnel deliver the services in a setting where only students who have expressed consent are present; and(iii)qualified personnel deliver the services in a manner consistent with state and federal law.(b)"Implementation partner" means a public institution of higher education or other entity receiving state funds with demonstrated expertise in school-based behavioral health, workforce development, and coordination of behavioral health services that enters into a contract or memorandum of understanding with the Department of Health and Human Services to support implementation of the program.(c)(i)"Multi-tiered system of support" means a coordinated, data-informed framework for delivering school-based mental health supports, prevention services, and behavioral health interventions through layered tiers of increasing intensity, implemented as a coordinated system in active collaboration with a:(A)parent;(B)school;(C)local mental health authority;(D)community coalition or prevention network; and(E)health care provider, as that term is defined in Section 78B-3-403.(ii)"Multi-tiered system of support" includes the following tiers of mental health support:(A)tier one, which includes:(I)practices that support guardian consent, transparency, and data-informed decision making, including use of school mental health outcomes dashboards and school-based data dashboards;(II)administration of universal wellbeing and school-climate surveys;(III)targeted mental health screenings and individualized mental health assessments, consistent with Section 53F-2-522;(IV)school-wide mental health needs assessments and mental health promotion activities;(V)school-wide mental health training for educational professionals and students;(VI)collaboration with the SafeUT Crisis Line created in Section 53H-4-210; and(VII)collaboration with the Suicide Prevention Coalition created in Subsection 26B-5-611(3);(B)tier two, which includes:(I)student access to prevention and groups that promote mental health coping skills for students at risk of developing anxiety, depression, or other mental health concerns;(II)delivery of mental health support in school settings including telehealth services; and(III)access to physical-health telehealth services through the school-based mental health support described in Section 53F-2-415;(C)tier three, which includes:(I)student access to short-term, caregiver-consented, one-to-one mental health services delivered in person or via telehealth;(II)immediate access to case-management services and caregiver-liaison supports;(III)access to mental health care providers through coordination with the implementation partner and community-based providers;(IV)access to physical-health telehealth services through the school-based mental health supports described in Section 53F-2-415; and(V)coordination with community mental health providers for students awaiting placement; and(D)tier four, which includes, student access to psychiatric evaluation and consultation through coordination with appropriate health care providers.(d)"Participating LEA" means a local education agency that:(i)the Department of Health and Human Services selects to participate in the program; and(ii)contracts with an implementation partner to implement the program.(e)"Participating RESA" means a regional education service agency that:(i)the Department of Health and Human Services selects to participate in the program; and(ii)contracts with an implementation partner to implement the program.(f)"Program" means the School-based Behavioral Health Pilot Program created in Subsection (2).(g)"Regional education service agency" or "RESA" means the same as the term is defined in Section 53G-4-410.(h)"Telehealth services" means the same as that term is defined in 26B-4-704.(2)There is created a three-year pilot program known as the School-based Behavioral Health Pilot Program, that the Department of Health and Human Services administers, to support implementation of a coordinated, statewide approach to school-based behavioral health services through:(a)delivery of technical assistance and training to implement a multi-tiered system of support; and(b)enhancement of mental health service operations in schools, including:(i)prevention;(ii)intervention; and(iii)recovery services.(3)The Department of Health and Human Services shall:(a)solicit proposals from:(i)an LEA or RESA to participate in the program; and(ii)an implementation partner to receive program funds;(b)subject to legislative appropriations:(i)award program funds to an implementation partner on a competitive basis; and(ii)dedicate resources for statewide implementation support to a participating LEA or RESA through a contract with an implementation partner which is separate from program funds, including:(A)training;(B)technical assistance;(C)workforce development; and(D)evaluation;(c)evaluate how the program's standards, infrastructure, and outcomes compare to implementation of the grant program described in Section 53F-2-415, including identification of statutory, regulatory, or programmatic gaps that limit statewide consistency, accountability, or equitable access to school-based behavioral health services;(d)coordinate the implementation of the program with behavioral health, Medicaid, and school-based health initiatives, to:(i)avoid duplication; and(ii)promote alignment with practices established for the program, including:(A)statewide screening; and(B)referral, training, and data-reporting practices;(e)on or before December 31, 2028, submit to the Health and Human Services Interim Committee findings and recommendations regarding how to apply the requirements, standards, or practices the program develops more broadly to strengthen the grant program described in Section 53F-2-415;(f)retain responsibility for program administration, fiscal oversight, accountability, and reporting related to school-based behavioral health services under the program; and(g)enter into a contract or memorandum of understanding with an implementation partner to support statewide implementation of the program, specifying:(i)roles and responsibilities of each party;(ii)data-sharing and privacy protections;(iii)reporting expectations;(iv)technical assistance and training;(v)workforce development and retention support;(vi)coordination of telehealth and gap-filling behavioral health services;(vii)evaluation metrics; and(viii)continuous improvement support.(4)The Department of Health and Human Services may consult with the state board and education stakeholders when implementing the requirements of this section.(5)(a)To participate in the program, an LEA or RESA shall:(i)submit an application to the Department of Health and Human Services:(A)describing how participation will further the purposes of the program;(B)describing partnerships with the local mental health authority, community coalitions, and parents;(C)describing how the LEA or RESA will obtain, document, and honor parental consent for individual and group-based services, including safeguards for non-consented students; and(D)outlining metrics the LEA or RESA will use to measure program effectiveness;(ii)contract with an implementation partner to which the Department of Health and Human Services awards program funds;(iii)implement statewide student mental health screening practices in accordance with Section 53F-2-522;(iv)comply the with parental notification and consent requirements described in Section 53G-9-902;(v)implement statewide referral protocols;(vi)participate in statewide data collection and reporting requirements; and(vii)ensure completion of baseline training requirements the state board establishes.(b)Nothing in this section alters an LEA's ability to elect whether to participate in a mental health screening program under Section 53F-2-522.(6)(a)An implementation partner that receives program funds under this section shall:(i)contract with a participating LEA or RESA to implement and coordinate a comprehensive multi-tiered system of support that addresses each tier described in Subsection (1)(c) through:(A)services;(B)partnerships; or(C)referral pathways;(ii)demonstrate active partnerships, appropriate to local context, with:(A)the local mental health authority serving the LEA or RESA;(B)at least one community-based coalition, prevention network, or family-serving organization; and(C)parents or caregivers, through meaningful engagement in planning, implementation, and continuous improvement;(iii)to support statewide implementation of the program, provide support to a participating LEA or RESA through:(A)technical assistance;(B)training;(C)workforce development support;(D)coordination of telehealth and gap-filling services; and(E)evaluation; and(iv)use program funds to support eligible initiatives, including:(A)implementation of a multi-tiered system of support;(B)provisions of mental health training for educational professionals;(C)coordination with the participating LEA or RESA for technical assistance, telehealth services, and workforce support; and(D)compliance with statewide screening, referral, training, and data-reporting requirements.(b)An implementation partner may not:(i)regarding the administration of the program:(A)establish policy or standards;(B)adopt or enforce rules;(C)determine eligibility for participation;(D)require an LEA, RESA, student, or family to participate in the program;(E)override parental consent or student choice; or(F)directly assign students to services without a participating LEA's or RESA's referral;(ii)selectively implement individual tiers in isolation from the overall system; or(iii)deliver group-based mental health services in a general classroom setting during instructional time unless all students present have documented parental or caregiver consent to participate.(c)All activities of the implementation partner, regarding the program, are subject to the oversight and direction of the Department of Health and Human Services.(d)The implementation described in Subsection (6)(a)(i), may vary based on:(i)local capacity;(ii)staffing models; or(iii)community partnerships.(7)Upon request of the Health and Human Services Interim Committee, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report on the program's progress and outcomes, including:(a)student access to services;(b)workforce development outcomes;(c)geographic and rural reach;(d)changes in service wait times;(e)measures of cross-system collaboration and family engagement; and(f)measurable student outcome indicators.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53F-9-204 is amended to read:53F-9-204. Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account.(1)There is created within the Uniform School Fund a restricted account known as the "Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account."(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the account shall be funded from the following revenue sources:(i)15% of the difference between, as determined by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst:(A)the estimated amount of ongoing Income Tax Fund and Uniform School Fund revenue available for the Legislature to appropriate for the next fiscal year; and(B)the amount of ongoing appropriations from the Income Tax Fund and Uniform School Fund in the current fiscal year; and(ii)other appropriations as the Legislature may designate.(b)If the appropriation described in Subsection (2)(a) would cause the ongoing appropriations to the account to exceed 11% of Uniform School Fund appropriations described in Section 53F-9-201.1 for the same fiscal year, the Legislature shall appropriate only those funds necessary to ensure that the ongoing appropriations to the account equal 11% of Uniform School Fund appropriations for that fiscal year.(3)Subject to the availability of ongoing appropriations to the account, in accordance with Utah Constitution, Article X, Section 5, Subsection (4), the ongoing appropriation to the account shall be used to fund:(a)except for a year described in Subsection (3)(b) or (c), one-time appropriations to the public education system, including at least $65,000,000 to the Catalyst Center Grant Program described in Section 53E-3-507.1;(b)the Minimum School Program for a year in which Income Tax Fund revenue and Uniform School Fund revenue are insufficient to fund:(i)ongoing appropriations to the public education system; and(ii)enrollment growth and inflation estimates, as defined in Section 53F-9-201.1; and(c)the minimum basic local amount as defined in Section 53F-2-301 for a year in which the minimum basic tax rate, as defined in Section 53F-2-301, is insufficient to generate the amount described in Subsection 53F-2-301(2)(a).(4)(a)The account shall earn interest.(b)All interest earned on account money shall be deposited in the account.(5)On or before December 31, 2023, and every three years thereafter, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall:(a)review the percentages described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) and (2)(b); and(b)recommend to the Executive Appropriations Committee any changes based on the review described in Subsection (5)(a).(6)In preparing budget bills for a given fiscal year, the Executive Appropriations Committee shall make the one-time appropriations described in Subsection (3)(a) by appropriating at least the lesser of 10% of the total amount of the one-time appropriations to:(a)the cost of providing 32 paid professional hours for teachers in accordance with Section 53F-7-203;(b)the amount to make the distribution required under Section 53F-2-527;(c)the cost of the Stipends for Future Educators Grant Program described in Section 53F-5-223;(d) the cost of the School-Based Behavioral Health Pilot Program described in Section 53F-5-224; and(d)(e)the cost of the Rural School Sports Facilities Grant Program described in Section 53F-10-303.(7)No later than October 15 of each year, the state board shall report to the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst an estimated cost for each of the one-time appropriations described in Subsection (6).

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53G-9-902 is amended to read:53G-9-902. Informed parental consent required -- Parental notification required.(1)Except as provided in a student's IEP or Section 504 accommodation plan:(a)an individual who is not authorized personnel may not provide a restricted service; and(b)authorized personnel may not provide a restricted service:(i)outside the scope of the relevant license; or(ii)except as provided in the School-Based Behavioral Health Pilot Program described in Section 53F-5-224, with other students present.(2)For authorized personnel to provide a restricted service:(a)the relevant LEA, school, or authorized personnel shall obtain informed written parental consent before the first session of a restricted service in a given school year, using a standard form that includes:(i)fields for at least the following information:(A)the name of the student;(B)the name of the individual giving informed consent; and(C)the name of each authorized personnel who has authority under the informed written consent to provide a restricted service;(ii)a statement that the authorized personnel will provide information about the restricted service in accordance with Subsection (2)(b), including that the parent has the right to opt out of receiving notifications at any time; and(iii)a statement that authorized personnel will adhere to the topics or issues the parent identifies, in collaboration with authorized personnel, for discussion or exclusion with the student under Subsection (3)(a), except that the authorized personnel may address topics if the omission would compromise the student's immediate safety, the omission would violate mandatory reporting obligations, or, based on behaviors or statements the authorized personnel observes, the authorized personnel determines a need to assess the student's safety; and(b)unless the student's parent opts out of receiving notifications from the authorized personnel under this Subsection (2)(b), within one business day after each session of a restricted service, the authorized personnel shall provide to the student's parent:(i)notice that the restricted service took place; and(ii)a description of the topic of the restricted service.(3)(a)(i)When obtaining the informed written parental consent described in Subsection (2)(a), the LEA, school, or authorized personnel shall, through consultation with the parent, provide the parent an opportunity to identify topics or issues the parent intends the authorized personnel to address or to not address with the student.(ii)Except as described in Subsection (3)(a)(iii), authorized personnel may not address a topic or issue for which a parent has expressly stated an intent for authorized personnel to not address with the student under this Subsection (3)(a).(iii)Subsection (3)(a)(ii) does not apply if:(A)an omission within a restricted service would compromise the student's immediate safety; or(B)the student discloses information that creates a duty on the authorized personnel to make a mandatory report for the purpose of discussing the information with the student to the extent necessary to make the report, including for suspected cases of child abuse or neglect under Section 80-2-602, abuse of a student under Section 53E-6-701, or any other legally mandated duty to report an incident.(b)(i)The requirement to obtain prior informed written parental consent before providing a restricted service described in Subsection (2)(a) does not apply in a case in which a delay to contact a parent would create an immediate serious risk of suicide or serious bodily injury, as defined in Section 76-1-101.5, to the student or to another individual.(ii)For a circumstance described in Subsection (3)(b)(i), the LEA, school, or authorized personnel shall notify a parent in accordance with Section 53G-9-604.(c)A student's IEP or Section 504 accommodation plan that includes a restricted service satisfies the informed parental consent requirement described in Subsection (2)(a).(4)(a)The state board may make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, regarding the application of this section to the actions of educators and staff in the public education system.(b)The state board shall, in consultation with the Department of Health and Human Services, provide guidance to authorized personnel, educators, and school support staff on conduct and practices that constitute and do not constitute a restricted service.(5)Nothing in this part authorizes an individual to take an action that exceeds the scope of the individual's license or certification.(6)This section does not apply to a service a student accesses through the SafeUT Crisis Line established in Section 53H-4-210.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 63I-1-253 is amended to read:63I-1-253. Repeal dates: Titles 53 through 53G.(1)Section 53-1-122, Road Rage Awareness and Prevention Restricted Account, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Section 53-2a-105, Emergency Management Administration Council created -- Function -- Composition -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)Section 53-2a-1103, Search and Rescue Advisory Board -- Members -- Compensation, is repealed July 1, 2030.(4)Section 53-2a-1104, General duties of the Search and Rescue Advisory Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 15, Grid Resilience Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(6)Section 53-2d-104, State Emergency Medical Services Committee -- Membership -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(7)Section 53-2d-503, Establishment of maximum rates, is repealed July 1, 2027.(8)Section 53-5a-302, Concealed Firearm Review Board -- Membership -- Compensation -- Terms -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2029.(9)Section 53-11-104, Board, is repealed July 1, 2029.(10)Title 53, Chapter 31, Department Interaction With Local Law Enforcement, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)Subsection 53C-3-203(4)(b)(vii), regarding the distribution of money from the Land Exchange Distribution Account to the Geological Survey for test wells and other hydrologic studies in the West Desert, is repealed July 1, 2030.(12)Subsection 53E-1-201(1)(q), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(13)Subsection 53E-2-304(6), regarding foreclosing a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(14)Subsection 53E-3-503(5), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(15)Subsection 53E-3-503(6), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(16)Subsection 53E-4-202(8)(b), regarding a standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(17)Section 53E-4-203, Standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(18)Title 53E, Chapter 6, Part 5, Utah Professional Practices Advisory Commission, is repealed July 1, 2033.(19)Subsection 53E-7-207(7), regarding a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(20)Section 53F-5-215, Elementary teacher preparation assessment grant, is repealed July 1, 2028.(21)Section 53F-5-219, Local Innovations Civics Education Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2026.(22)Section 53F-5-224, School-Based Behavioral Health Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2029.(22)(23)Title 53F, Chapter 10, Part 2, Capital Projects Evaluation Panel, is repealed July 1, 2027.(23)(24)Subsection 53G-4-608(2)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(24)(25)Subsection 53G-4-608(4)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(25)(26)Section 53G-9-212, Drinking water quality in schools, is repealed July 1, 2027.(26)(27)Subsection 53G-9-703(4), regarding the parental video presentation concerning student use of technology, is repealed January 1, 2030.(27)(28)Subsection 53H-1-402(1)(j), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(28)(29)Section 53H-1-604, Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(29)(30)Subsection 53H-4-210(3), regarding the creation of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(30)(31)Subsection 53H-4-210(4), regarding the appointment of the members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(31)(32)Subsection 53H-4-210(5), regarding the attorney general designating the chair of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(32)(33)Subsection 53H-4-210(6), regarding the quorum requirements of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(33)(34)Subsection 53H-4-210(7), regarding a formal action of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(34)(35)Subsection 53H-4-210(8), regarding compensation for members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(35)(36)Subsection 53H-4-210(9), regarding the support staff for the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(36)(37)Section 53H-4-306.1, Definitions -- Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center, is repealed July 1, 2028.(37)(38)Section 53H-4-306.2, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Designation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2028.(38)(39)Section 53H-4-306.3, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Steering committee, is repealed July 1, 2028.(39)(40)Section 53H-4-306.4, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Industry advisory board, is repealed July 1, 2028.(40)(41)Section 53H-4-306.5, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Duties of the project director, is repealed July 1, 2028.(41)(42)Section 53H-4-306.6, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Project development and strategic objectives -- Reporting requirements, is repealed July 1, 2028.(42)(43)Section 53H-4-307.1, Center for Civic Excellence, is repealed July 1, 2030.(43)(44)Section 53H-4-307.2, Center for Civic Excellence -- Duties -- Authority, is repealed July 1, 2030.(44)(45)Section 53H-4-307.3, Center for Civic Excellence -- Leadership, is repealed July 1, 2030.(45)(46)Section 53H-4-307.4, Center for Civic Excellence -- Faculty, is repealed July 1, 2030.(46)(47)Section 53H-4-307.5, Center for Civic Excellence -- Curriculum, is repealed July 1, 2030.(47)(48)Section 53H-4-307.6, Center for Civic Excellence -- Oversight -- Reporting, is repealed July 1, 2030.(48)(49)Section 53H-4-313, Food Security Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(49)(50)Section 53H-8-305, Five-year performance goals, is repealed July 1, 2027.(50)(51)Title 53H, Chapter 10, Part 4, Education Savings Incentive Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.